Tennessee, session 114, SB0599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-52-109, is amended by deleting the
language "ninety (90) days" and substituting "one hundred eighty (180) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0599
002205
- 1 -